New Jersey, session 222, A758.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 1 of P.L.1993, c.43 (C.33:1-12a) is amended to read as follows: 1.    a.         A person who holds a Class C license, except a plenary retail transit license, or a club license shall ensure that a warning notice [prepared] developed by the Commissioner of the Department of Health [and Senior Services] , in accordance with subsection b. of this section, is posted prominently in any service area as well as on a wall, towel dispenser , or other appropriate location in any public rest room for [women] patrons on the licensed premises.  The notice shall warn patrons of the health risks of alcohol consumption and that alcohol consumption during pregnancy has been determined to be harmful to the fetus and can cause birth defects, low birth weight , and Fetal Alcohol Syndrome, which is one of the leading causes of intellectual disabilities. b.    Within six months of the effective date of P.L.    , c.  (pending before the Legislature as this bill), the commissioner shall update the warning notice required under subsection a. of this section to reflect the most current information available regarding the health risks of alcohol consumption, which shall include but not be limited to, the consequences of prenatal alcohol exposure and the link between alcohol consumption and certain cancers.  The commissioner shall develop the warning notice in consultation with appropriate medical and scientific experts, professional organizations, and advocacy groups. c.    Not more than five years after reviewing and developing the notice as required under subsection b. of this section, the commissioner shall review the medical and scientific literature on the health risks of alcohol exposure and update the warning notice, if necessary, to reflect the most recent information to promote the public health and welfare.  Thereafter, the commission shall review and revise, if necessary, the notice as required under this section within five years of the previous review. (cf: P.L.2010, c.50, s.61) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.